Washington statutes.
RCW 29B.25.080

Fund-raising activities—Alternative reporting method. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

(1) Fund-raising activities meeting the standards of subsection (2) of this section may be reported in accordance with the provisions of this section in lieu of reporting in accordance with RCW 29B.25.090.

(2) Standards:

(a) The activity consists of one or more of the following:

(i) A sale of goods or services sold at a reasonable approximation of the fair market value of each item or service; or

(ii) A gambling operation that is licensed, conducted, or operated in accordance with the provisions of chapter 9.46 RCW; or

(iii) A gathering where food and beverages are purchased and the price of admission or the per person charge for the food and beverages is no more than twenty-five dollars; or

(iv) A concert, dance, theater performance, or similar entertainment event and the price of admission is no more than twenty-five dollars; or

(v) An auction or similar sale for which the total fair market value or cost of items donated by any person is no more than fifty dollars; and

(b) No person responsible for receiving money at the fund-raising activity knowingly accepts payments from a single person at or from such an activity to the candidate or committee aggregating more than fifty dollars unless the name and address of the person making the payment, together with the amount paid to the candidate or committee, are disclosed in the report filed pursuant to subsection (6) of this section; and

(c) Any other standards established by rule of the commission to prevent frustration of the purposes of this title.

(3) All funds received from a fund-raising activity that conforms with subsection (2) of this section must be deposited in the depository within five business days of receipt by the treasurer or deputy treasurer.

(4) At the time reports are required under RCW 29B.25.090, the treasurer or deputy treasurer making the deposit shall file with the commission a report of the fund-raising activity which must contain the following information:

(a) The date of the activity;

(b) A precise description of the fund-raising methods used in the activity; and

(c) The total amount of cash receipts from persons, each of whom paid no more than fifty dollars.

(5) The treasurer or deputy treasurer shall certify the report is correct.

(6) The treasurer shall report pursuant to RCW 29B.25.090 and 29B.25.100:

(a) The name and address and the amount contributed by each person contributing goods or services with a fair market value of more than fifty dollars to a fund-raising activity reported under subsection (4) of this section; and

(b) The name and address and the amount paid by each person whose identity can be ascertained, who made a contribution to the candidate or committee aggregating more than fifty dollars at or from such a fund-raising activity.

[ 2024 c 164 s 425; 2019 c 428 s 19. Prior: 2010 c 205 s 5; 2010 c 204 s 407; 1989 c 280 s 6; 1982 c 147 s 5; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 112 s 9. Formerly RCW 42.17A.230, 42.17.067.]

NOTES:

Intent—Construction—Rules remain valid—Effective date—2024 c 164: See notes following RCW 29B.10.010.

Finding—Effective date—2019 c 428: See notes following RCW 29B.20.110.

Effective date—2010 c 204 ss 101-504, 506-601, 603-702, and 801-1103: See note following RCW 29B.15.010.

Effective date—1989 c 280: See note following RCW 29B.25.020.

Construction—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 112: See note following RCW 29B.60.020.